Connecticut, session 2026, SB00217.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (i) of section 49-8a of the general statutes is
2 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
3 1, 2026):
4 (i) (1) A mortgagee shall accept, as payment tendered for satisfaction
5 or partial satisfaction of a mortgage loan, a bank check, certified check,
6 attorney's clients' funds account check, title insurance company check,
7 wire transfer or any other form of payment authorized under federal
8 law.
9 (2) For mortgage loans made on or after October 1, 2026, a mortgagee
10 shall accept payment tendered by a mortgagor on a monthly,
11 semimonthly or biweekly basis. For purposes of this subdivision,
12 "biweekly" means occurring every two weeks and "semimonthly"
SB217 / File No. 121 1

SB217 File No. 121
13 means occurring twice each month.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 49-8a(i)
BA Joint Favorable
SB217 / File No. 121 2

SB217 File No. 121
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires mortgagees to accept mortgage payments tendered
on a monthly, semimonthly or biweekly basis and results in no fiscal
impact to the state as they are not parties to mortgage loans.
SB217 / File No. 121 3

SB217 File No. 121
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 217
AN ACT REQUIRING MORTGAGEES TO ACCEPT MORTGAGE
PAYMENTS TENDERED ON A MONTHLY, SEMIMONTHLY OR
BIWEEKLY BASIS.